test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-complex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mitmetaolistesse, mitmetaolisisse]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mitmetaolistes, mitmetaolisis]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mitmetaolistest, mitmetaolisist]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [mitmetaolistele, mitmetaolisile]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mitmetaolistel, mitmetaolisil]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mitmetaolistelt, mitmetaolisilt]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mitmetaolisteks, mitmetaolisiks]
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: mitmetaolisteni
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: mitmetaolistena
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: mitmetaolisteta
     mitmetaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: mitmetaolistega
     #
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: niipaljuke
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: niipaljukese
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Par: niipaljukest
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [niipaljukesesse, niipaljukesse]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: niipaljukeses
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: niipaljukesest
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+All: niipaljukesele
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: niipaljukesel
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: niipaljukeselt
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: niipaljukeseks
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: niipaljukeseni
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: niipaljukesena
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: niipaljukeseta
     niipaljuke+Pron+Sg+Com: niipaljukesega
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: niipaljukesed
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: niipaljukeste
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Par: niipaljukesi
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [niipaljukestesse, niipaljukesisse]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [niipaljukestes, niipaljukesis]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [niipaljukestest, niipaljukesist]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+All: [niipaljukestele, niipaljukesile]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [niipaljukestel, niipaljukesil]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [niipaljukestelt, niipaljukesilt]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [niipaljukesteks, niipaljukesiks]
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: niipaljukesteni
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: niipaljukestena
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: niipaljukesteta
     niipaljuke+Pron+Pl+Com: niipaljukestega
     #
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: teissugune
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: teissuguse
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Par: teissugust
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: teissugusesse
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: teissuguses
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: teissugusest
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+All: teissugusele
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: teissugusel
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: teissuguselt
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: teissuguseks
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: teissuguseni
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: teissugusena
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: teissuguseta
     teissugune+Pron+Sg+Com: teissugusega
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: teissugused
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: teissuguste
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Par: teissuguseid
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [teissugustesse, teissuguseisse]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [teissugustes, teissuguseis]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [teissugustest, teissuguseist]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+All: [teissugustele, teissuguseile]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [teissugustel, teissuguseil]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [teissugustelt, teissuguseilt]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [teissugusteks, teissuguseiks]
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: teissugusteni
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: teissugustena
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: teissugusteta
     teissugune+Pron+Pl+Com: teissugustega
     #
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: minusugune
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: minusuguse
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Par: minusugust
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: minusugusesse
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: minusuguses
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: minusugusest
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+All: minusugusele
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: minusugusel
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: minusuguselt
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: minusuguseks
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: minusuguseni
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: minusugusena
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: minusuguseta
     minusugune+Pron+Sg+Com: minusugusega
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: minusugused
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: minusuguste
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Par: minusuguseid
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [minusugustesse, minusuguseisse]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [minusugustes, minusuguseis]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [minusugustest, minusuguseist]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+All: [minusugustele, minusuguseile]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [minusugustel, minusuguseil]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [minusugustelt, minusuguseilt]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [minusugusteks, minusuguseiks]
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: minusugusteni
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: minusugustena
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: minusugusteta
     minusugune+Pron+Pl+Com: minusugustega
     #
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: minutaoline
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: minutaolise
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: minutaolist
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [minutaolisesse, minutaolisse]
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: minutaolises
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: minutaolisest
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+All: minutaolisele
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: minutaolisel
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: minutaoliselt
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: minutaoliseks
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: minutaoliseni
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: minutaolisena
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: minutaoliseta
     minutaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: minutaolisega
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: minutaolised
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: minutaoliste
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [minutaoliseid, minutaolisi]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [minutaolistesse, minutaolisisse]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [minutaolistes, minutaolisis]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [minutaolistest, minutaolisist]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [minutaolistele, minutaolisile]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [minutaolistel, minutaolisil]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [minutaolistelt, minutaolisilt]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [minutaolisteks, minutaolisiks]
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: minutaolisteni
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: minutaolistena
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: minutaolisteta
     minutaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: minutaolistega
     #
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: samataoline
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: samataolise
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Par: samataolist
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [samataolisesse, samataolisse]
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: samataolises
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: samataolisest
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+All: samataolisele
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: samataolisel
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: samataoliselt
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: samataoliseks
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: samataoliseni
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: samataolisena
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: samataoliseta
     samataoline+Pron+Sg+Com: samataolisega
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: samataolised
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: samataoliste
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [samataoliseid, samataolisi]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [samataolistesse, samataolisisse]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [samataolistes, samataolisis]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [samataolistest, samataolisist]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+All: [samataolistele, samataolisile]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [samataolistel, samataolisil]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [samataolistelt, samataolisilt]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [samataolisteks, samataolisiks]
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: samataolisteni
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: samataolistena
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: samataolisteta
     samataoline+Pron+Pl+Com: samataolistega
     #
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Nom: teiesugune
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Gen: teiesuguse
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Par: teiesugust
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ill: teiesugusesse
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ine: teiesuguses
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ela: teiesugusest
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+All: teiesugusele
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ade: teiesugusel
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Abl: teiesuguselt
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Tra: teiesuguseks
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Trm: teiesuguseni
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Ess: teiesugusena
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Abe: teiesuguseta
     teiesugune+Pron+Sg+Com: teiesugusega
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Nom: teiesugused
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Gen: teiesuguste
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Par: teiesuguseid
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [teiesugustesse, teiesuguseisse]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [teiesugustes, teiesuguseis]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [teiesugustest, teiesuguseist]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+All: [teiesugustele, teiesuguseile]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [teiesugustel, teiesuguseil]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [teiesugustelt, teiesuguseilt]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [teiesugusteks, teiesuguseiks]
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Trm: teiesugusteni
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Ess: teiesugustena
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Abe: teiesugusteta
     teiesugune+Pron+Pl+Com: teiesugustega
     #
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: teietaoline
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: teietaolise
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Par: teietaolist
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [teietaolisse, teietaolisesse]
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: teietaolises
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: teietaolisest
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+All: teietaolisele
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: teietaolisel
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: teietaoliselt
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: teietaoliseks
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: teietaoliseni
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: teietaolisena
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: teietaoliseta
     teietaoline+Pron+Sg+Com: teietaolisega
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: teietaolised
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: teietaoliste
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [teietaolisi, teietaoliseid]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [teietaolistesse, teietaolisisse]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [teietaolistes, teietaolisis]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [teietaolistest, teietaolisist]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+All: [teietaolistele, teietaolisile]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [teietaolistel, teietaolisil]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [teietaolistelt, teietaolisilt]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [teietaolisteks, teietaolisiks]
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Trm: teietaolisteni
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Ess: teietaolistena
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Abe: teietaolisteta
     teietaoline+Pron+Pl+Com: teietaolistega
     #
